Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB233.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2097YC (1) 91 sc/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 1.19 Actions of certain 1 international organizations not binding. 2 1. A rule, regulation, fee, tax, policy, or mandate of 3 the united nations, an agency of the united nations, or the 4 world economic forum is not binding on Iowa and shall not be 5 enforced or implemented by the state or an agency, department, 6 board, commission, political subdivision, or other entity of 7 the state. 8 2. The attorney general shall initiate an action in the name 9 of the state to seek an injunction to restrain any violations 10 of this section. 11